Washington statutes.
RCW 10.108.010

Declaration.

There is currently no system in place in Washington state to expedite the apprehension of violent criminals who seriously injure or kill local, state, or federal law enforcement officers. Other states have adopted blue alert systems to achieve this objective. The legislature declares that it is necessary to create a statewide blue alert system to speed the apprehension of violent criminals who kill or seriously injure local, state, or federal law enforcement officers.

[ 2012 c 37 s 1.]